Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.100

Assessment roll—Hearing—Objections—Authority of council.

At the time fixed for hearing objections to the confirmation of the assessment roll, and at the times to which the hearing may be adjourned, the council may correct, revise, raise, lower, change, or modify the roll or any part thereof, or set aside the roll and order the assessment to be made de novo and at the conclusion thereof confirm the roll by ordinance.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.44.100. Prior: 1929 c 97 s 3, part; 1911 c 98 s 21, part; RRS s 9373, part.]